Washington statutes.
RCW 33.20.060

State, political subdivisions, fiduciaries as depositors.

The state of Washington and the political subdivisions thereof, and trustees, administrators, executors, guardians, and other fiduciaries, either individual or corporate, in their fiduciary capacity, may be depositors in associations.

[ 1982 c 3 s 39; 1945 c 235 s 44; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-163.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.